Missouri, session 2026, HB3448.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.385, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as section 478.385, to read as follows:
478.385. There shall be four circuit judges in the seventh judicial circuit [consisting
2 of the county of Clay]. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be five circuit judges in the
3 seventh judicial circuit.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.